Hawaii statutes.
§291C-94 Emerging from alley, driveway, or
building. The driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, building,
private road, or driveway or from any public or private property other than a
highway that is adjacent to a bicycle lane, bicycle path, sidewalk, or sidewalk
area shall stop the vehicle immediately prior to driving onto the bicycle lane,
bicycle path, sidewalk, or sidewalk area extending across the alley, building
entrance, road, or driveway, or such public or private property, or in the
event there is no bikeway or sidewalk area, shall stop at the point nearest the
street to be entered where the driver has a view of approaching traffic
thereon. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1977, c 180, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next